Alabama, session 2026rs, HB32.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-5-222, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
Page 1

amended to read as follows:
HB32 INTRODUCED
"§32-5-222
(a) Every person transporting a child in a motor
vehicle operated on the roadways, streets, or highways of this
state, shall provide for the protection of the child by
properly using an aftermarket or integrated child passenger
restraint system meeting applicable federal motor vehicle
safety standards and the requirements of subsection (b). This
section shall not be interpreted to release in part or in
whole the responsibility of an automobile manufacturer to
insureensure the safety of children to a level at least
equivalent to existing federal safety standards for adults. In
no event shall failure to wear a child passenger restraint
system be considered as contributory negligence. The term
"motor vehicle" as used in this section shall include aany
passenger car, pickup truck, van (seating capacity of 10 or
less), minivan, or sports utility vehicle that has a seating
capacity of 10 less.
(b) The size appropriate restraint system required for
a child in subsection (a) must meet the requirements of
Section 32-5B-4 and shall include all of the following:
(1) Infant only seats andor convertible seats used in
the rear facingrear-facing position for infants until the
child is at least one yeartwo years of age or 20 pounds35
pounds in weight. In the event that a child is less than two
years of age and weighs more than the recommended weight
rating for the infant seat, but is less than 35 pounds, a
convertible seat must be used.
(2) Convertible seats in the forward position or
Page 2

(2) Convertible seats in the forward position or
HB32 INTRODUCED
forward facingforward-facing seats until the child is at least
five years of age or 40 pounds65 pounds in weight.
(3) BoosterBelt-positioning booster seats until the
child is at least six years of age and can satisfy all of the
following conditions:
a. The child is able to sit all the way back against
the vehicle seat.
b. The child's knees bend comfortably at the edge of
the seat.
c. The seatbelt crosses the child's shoulder between
the neck and arm.
d. The lap belt is able to lie flat across the child's
upper thighs.
e. The child is able to stay seated as described in
this subdivision for the entire trip.
(4) Seat belts until 15 years of age.
(c) No provision of thisThis section shall not be
construed as creatingto create any duty, standard of care,
right, or liability between parent and child that is not
recognized under the laws of the State of Alabama as they
presently exist, or may, at any time in the future, be
constituted by statute or decision.
(d)(1) Any person violating the provisions of this
section shall be punished as follows:
a. On a first violation, the person may be fined
twenty-five dollars ($25) for each offense.
b. On a second violation within a five-year period, the
person shall be fined fifty dollars ($50).
Page 3

person shall be fined fifty dollars ($50).
HB32 INTRODUCED
c. On a third violation within a five-year period, the
person shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100).
d. On a fourth or subsequent violation within a
five-year period, the person shall be fined one hundred fifty
dollars ($150).
(2) The chargesUpon a first violation only, the charge
may be dismissed by the trial judge hearing the case and no
court costs shall be assessed uponif the defendant provides
proof of acquisition of an appropriate child passenger
restraint.
(e) Fifteen dollars ($15) of aeach fine imposed under
subsection (d) shall be used to distribute vouchers for size
appropriate child passenger restraint systems to families of
limited income in the state. The fifteen dollars ($15) shall
be deposited in the State Treasury to be distributed by the
100 state Comptroller to the Department of Public Health, which
101 shall administer the program free of charge.
102 (f) Nothing in this sectionThe provisions of this
103 section notwithstanding, nothing contained herein shall be
104 deemed a violation of any law whichthat would otherwise
105 nullify or change in any way the provisions or coverage of any
106 insurance contract.
107 (g) For the purpose of identifying habitually negligent
108 drivers and habitual or frequent violators, the Department of
109 Public SafetySecretary of the Alabama State Law Enforcement
110 Agency shall assess the following points:
111 (1) Violation of child safety restraint requirements,
112 first offense ......................1 point.
Page 4

first offense ......................1 point.
HB32 INTRODUCED
113 (2) Violation of child safety restraint requirements,
114 second or subsequent offense .............2 points.
115 (h) Every person transporting a child shall be
116 responsible for assuringensuring that each child is properly
117 restrained pursuant to this section. The provisions shall;
118 provided, this subsection does not apply to taxis and allor
119 any motor vehicles with a seating capacity of 11 or more
120 passengers.
121 (i) Each state, county, and municipal police department
122 shall maintain statistical information on traffic stops of
123 minorities pursuant to this section, and shall report that
124 information monthly to the Department of Public SafetyAlabama
125 State Law Enforcement Agency and the Office of the Attorney
126 General."
127 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
128 1, 2026.
Page 5